src/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
LEXICON Interjection
åhå ij ;
hæ ij ;
au ij ;
eh ij ;
eeh ij ;
eee ij ;
jah ij ;
ah ij ;
ei ij ;
mhm ij ;
æh ij ;
hm ij ;
mmm ij ;
ooog ij ;
jaha ij ;
eeem ij ;
okei ij ;
em ij ;
åh ij ;
mm ij ;
deee ij ;
aaah ij ;
jaaa ij ;
æ ij ;
ååå ij ;
åff ij ;
æh ij ; 
uuu ij ;
ssså ij ;
eeeh ij ;
joda ij ;
gid ij ;
gid adv ;
uff ij ;
ptro ij ;
ja ij ;
nei ij ;
å ij ;
å f1 ;
oi ij ;
javel ij ;
dæven ij ;
joddu ij ;
jasså ij ;
kra ij ;
oi-oi ij ;
ko-ko ij ;
jøss ij ;
adjø ij ;

LEXICON ij
 +Interj: # ;
